Florida, session 2026, SB828.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âPresent paragraphs (f) through (l) of subsection 16 (10) of section 768.28, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 17 paragraphs (g) through (m), respectively, a new paragraph (f) is 18 added to that subsection, and paragraph (b) of subsection (9) of 19 that section is amended, to read: 20 768.28âWaiver of sovereign immunity in tort actions; 21 recovery limits; civil liability for damages caused during a 22 riot; limitation on attorney fees; statute of limitations; 23 exclusions; indemnification; risk management programs.â 24 (9) 25 (b)âAs used in this subsection, the term: 26 1.ââEmployeeâ includes any volunteer firefighter. 27 2.ââOfficer, employee, or agentâ includes, but is not 28 limited to, any health care provider when providing services 29 pursuant to s. 766.1115; any nonprofit independent college or 30 university located and chartered in this state which owns or 31 operates an accredited medical school, and its employees or 32 agents, when providing patient services pursuant to paragraph 33 (10)(g) (10)(f); any public defender or her or his employee or 34 agent, including an assistant public defender or an 35 investigator; and any member of a Child Protection Team, as 36 defined in s. 39.01, or any member of a threat management team, 37 as described in s. 1006.07(7), when carrying out her or his 38 duties as a team member under the control, direction, and 39 supervision of the state or any of its agencies or subdivisions. 40 (10) 41 (f)âFor purposes of this section, a contractor operating 42 public transit services under a contract with the state or any 43 of its agencies or subdivisions, or any employee, agent, or 44 subcontractor of a contractor providing such services, is deemed 45 an agent of the state, agency, or subdivision while acting 46 within the scope of and pursuant to guidelines established in 47 such contract or by rule. For purposes of this paragraph, the 48 term âpublic transitâ has the same meaning as in s. 341.031(6). 49 Section 2.âParagraph (b) of subsection (12) of section 50 766.1115, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 51 766.1115âHealth care providers; creation of agency 52 relationship with governmental contractors.â 53 (12)âAPPLICABILITY.âThis section applies to incidents 54 occurring on or after April 17, 1992. This section does not: 55 (b)âApply to any affiliation agreement or other contract 56 that is subject to s. 768.28(10)(g) s. 768.28(10)(f). 57 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.